Georgia statutes. TITLE 46 Public Utilities and Public Transportation
PART 6 Directors and Officers

46-3-290.
Management of business and affairs of electric membership corporation by board of directors; knowledge of limitations on directors’ authority required; qualifications; compensation and reimbursement for expenses.

Subject to the provisions of the articles of incorporation or the bylaws, the business and affairs of an electric membership corporation shall be managed by a board of directors.

No limitation upon the authority which the directors would have in the absence of such limitation, whether contained in the articles of incorporation, bylaws, or otherwise, shall be effective against persons, other than members and directors, who are without actual knowledge of such limitation.

Directors shall be natural persons of the age of 18 years or over. The articles of incorporation or bylaws may prescribe additional qualifications for directors.

The compensation, if any, of directors for their services as such shall be on a per diem basis and, unless otherwise provided in the bylaws, shall be fixed by the board of directors. Directors also shall be entitled to reimbursement of expenses actually and necessarily incurred by them in the performance of their duties.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 644, § 11; Ga. L. 1950, p. 233, § 1; Ga. L. 1975, p. 783, § 1; Code 1933, § 34C-601, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1587, § 1.

46-3-291.
Number of directors; statement of names and addresses of initial directors in articles of incorporation; duration of director’s service in office.

The number of directors of an electric membership corporation shall not be less than three. Subject to such limitation, the number of directors shall be fixed by the bylaws or a procedure set forth in the bylaws, except that the number constituting the initial board of directors shall be fixed by the articles of incorporation.

The number of directors may be increased or decreased from time to time by amendment to the bylaws or by other procedure set forth in the bylaws; but, unless otherwise provided in the bylaws, no decrease shall have the effect of shortening the term of any incumbent director. In the absence of a bylaw fixing the number of directors or establishing the number of directors by a procedure set forth in the bylaws, the number shall be the same as that stated in the articles of incorporation.

The names and addresses of the members of the initial board of directors shall be stated in the articles of incorporation. Each such person shall hold office until his successor shall have been elected and qualified or until his earlier resignation, removal from office, or death.

At the first annual meeting of members and at each annual meeting thereafter, the members shall elect directors to hold office until the next succeeding annual meeting, except in case of the classification of directors by staggered term as permitted by Code Section 46-3-293. Each director shall hold office for the term for which he is elected and until his successor shall have been elected and qualified or until his earlier resignation, removal from office, or death.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 644, § 11; Ga. L. 1950, p. 233, § 1; Ga. L. 1975, p. 783, § 1; Code 1933, § 34C-602, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1587, § 1.

46-3-292.
Provisional director.

If the directors of an electric membership corporation are deadlocked in the management of the corporate affairs and if injury to the electric membership corporation is being suffered or is threatened by reason thereof, the superior court of the county where the registered office of the electric membership corporation is located may appoint a provisional director pursuant to this Code section, notwithstanding any provisions of the articles of incorporation or bylaws of the electric membership corporation to the contrary and whether or not an action is pending for an involuntary dissolution of the electric membership corporation.

Action for such appointment may be filed by one-half of the directors or by not less than 25 members, except that, if the electric membership corporation has less than 50 members, action for such appointment may be filed by not less than 25 percent of the members. Notice of such action shall be served upon the directors, other than those who have filed the action, and upon the electric membership corporation in the manner provided by law for service of a summons and complaint; and a hearing shall be held not less than ten days after such service is effected. At such hearing all interested persons shall be given an opportunity to be heard.

The provisional director shall be an impartial person who is neither a member nor a creditor of the electric membership corporation nor related by consanguinity or affinity within the third degree, as computed according to the civil law, to any of the other directors of the electric membership corporation or to any judge of the court by which he is appointed. The provisional director shall have all the rights and powers of a director and shall be entitled to notice of the meetings of the board of directors and to vote at such meetings until he is removed by order of the court or by vote of a majority of the members present and voting at a meeting of members. The provisional director shall be entitled to receive such compensation as may be agreed upon between him and the electric membership corporation; and in the absence of such agreement he shall be entitled to such compensation as shall be fixed by the court.

History.

Code 1933, § 34C-603, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1587, § 1.

46-3-293.
Classification of directors; division of service territory into districts.

The articles of incorporation or a bylaw adopted by the members may provide that the directors be divided into either two or three classes, each class to be as nearly equal in number as possible, the term of office of directors of the first class to expire at the first annual meeting of members after their election, that of the second class to expire at the second annual meeting after their election, and that of the third class, if any, to expire at the third annual meeting after their election.

At each annual meeting after such classification, the number of directors equal to the number of the class whose term expires at the time of such meeting shall be elected to hold office until the second succeeding annual meeting, if there are two classes, or until the third succeeding annual meeting, if there are three classes. No classification of directors shall be effective prior to the first annual meeting of members.

If directors are classified and the number of directors is thereafter changed, any increase or decrease in the number of directors shall be so apportioned among the classes as to make all classes as nearly equal in number as possible. When the number of directors is increased and any newly created directorships are filled by the board, there shall be no classification of the additional directors until the next election of directors by the members.

Electric membership corporations having a lawfully classified board of directors when this article goes into effect may continue their existing classification even though not conforming to this Code section.

The articles of incorporation or the bylaws may provide for the division of the territory served or to be served by an electric membership corporation into two or more districts for any purpose, including, without limitation, the nomination and election of directors. The articles of incorporation or bylaws shall prescribe the boundaries of the districts, or the manner of establishing such boundaries of the districts, and the manner of changing such boundaries and the manner in which such districts shall function.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 644, § 11; Ga. L. 1950, p. 233, § 1; Code 1933, § 34A-114.1, enacted by Ga. L. 1950, p. 233, § 2; Code 1933, § 34C-604, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1587, § 1.

46-3-294.
Vacancies on board of directors generally.

Unless the articles of incorporation or bylaws otherwise provide:

Except as provided in paragraphs (2) and (3) of this Code section, any vacancy occurring in the board of directors may be filled by the affirmative vote of a majority of the remaining directors, though less than a quorum of the board of directors, or by the sole remaining director, as the case may be, or, if the vacancy is not so filled or if no director remains, by the members;

If a vacancy occurs with respect to a director elected by members from a particular district pursuant to subsection (e) of Code Section 46-3-293, the vacancy may be filled by the remaining director or directors elected by the members from that district or, if no such director remains, by the other remaining directors or by the members in accordance with paragraph (1) of this Code section;

Any directorship to be filled by reason of the removal of a director or directors, as provided in Code Section 46-3-295, shall be filled by the members or, if authorized by the members, by the remaining director or directors as provided in paragraph (1) of this Code section;

A director elected or appointed to fill a vacancy shall be elected or appointed for the unexpired term of his predecessor in office. Any directorship to be filled by reason of an increase in the number of directors may be filled by the board of directors, but only for a term of office continuing until the next election of directors by the members and the election and qualification of his successor;

A director who resigns may postpone the effectiveness of his resignation to a future date or upon the occurrence of a future event specified in a written tender of resignation. A vacancy shall be deemed to exist at the time of such tender; and the board of directors or the members may then or thereafter elect or appoint a successor to take office when the resignation, by its terms, becomes effective.

History.

Code 1933, § 34C-605, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1587, § 1.

46-3-295.
Removal of directors.

Unless otherwise provided in the bylaws, at any meeting of members with respect to which notice of such purpose has been given, the entire board of directors or any individual director may be removed, with or without cause, by the affirmative vote of a majority of the members of the electric membership corporation.

Whenever the members from a particular district are entitled to elect one or more directors pursuant to subsection (e) of Code Section 46-3-293, this Code section shall apply, in respect of the removal of the director or directors so elected, to the vote of the members from that district and not to the vote of the members as a whole.

If any or all directors are removed, new directors may be elected at the same meeting.

History.

Code 1933, § 34C-606, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1587, § 1.

46-3-296.
Quorum of directors; action by majority vote; conducting of meetings of board or committees by conference calls.

Unless the articles of incorporation or the bylaws provide that a different number shall constitute a quorum, a majority of the number of directors fixed by the bylaws or fixed by the procedure set forth in the bylaws, or, in the absence of such bylaw provisions, then a majority of the number stated in the articles of incorporation, shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business. In no case shall less than one-third of the total number of directors nor less than two directors constitute a quorum.

The vote of a majority of the directors present and voting at the time of the vote, if a quorum is present at such time, shall be the act of the board of directors unless the vote of a greater number is required by the articles of incorporation or the bylaws.

Unless the articles of incorporation or bylaws otherwise provide, members of the board of directors or any committee designated by such board may participate in a meeting of such board or committee by means of conference telephone or similar communications equipment by means of which all persons participating in the meeting can hear each other. Participation in a meeting pursuant to this subsection shall constitute presence in person at such meeting.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 644, § 11; Ga. L. 1950, p. 233, § 1; Ga. L. 1975, p. 783, § 1; Code 1933, § 34C-607, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1587, § 1.

46-3-297.
Executive committee and other committees.

Unless prohibited by the articles of incorporation or the bylaws, the board of directors, by resolution adopted by a majority of the full board of directors, may designate from among its members an executive committee and one or more other committees, each consisting of two or more directors and each of which, to the extent provided in such resolution or in the articles of incorporation or the bylaws of the electric membership corporation, shall have and may exercise all the authority of the board of directors; but no such committee shall have the authority of the board of directors in reference to:

Amending the articles of incorporation or the bylaws of the electric membership corporation;

Adopting a plan of merger or consolidation;

The sale, lease, exchange, or other disposition of all or substantially all the property and assets of the electric membership corporation; or

A voluntary dissolution of the electric membership corporation or a revocation thereof.

The board, by resolution adopted in accordance with subsection (a) of this Code section, may designate one or more directors as alternate members of any such committee, which directors may act in the place and stead of any absent member or members at any meeting of such committee.

Unless otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation or the bylaws or unless ordered by the board of directors, any such committee shall act by a majority of its members.

The designation of any such committee and the delegation thereto of authority shall not operate to relieve the board of directors or any member thereof of any responsibility imposed by law.

Nothing in this Code section shall be construed to invalidate any executive committee or other committee validly created under the electric membership corporation law of this state existing on July 1, 1981.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 644, § 12; Code 1933, § 34C-608, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1587, § 1.

46-3-298.
Place, time, and notice of directors’ meetings; waiver of notice; adjournment of meetings; notice of adjournment; manner of calling meetings.

Unless the articles of incorporation or bylaws otherwise provide, meetings of the board of directors, whether regular or special, may be held either within or outside of this state. The time and place for holding meetings of the board of directors may be fixed by or under the bylaws or, if not so fixed, by the board.

Regular meetings of the board of directors may be held with or without notice, as prescribed in the articles of incorporation or bylaws or in a standing resolution of the board of directors. Special meetings of the board of directors may be held upon such notice as is prescribed in the articles of incorporation or the bylaws. Unless otherwise prescribed in the articles of incorporation or bylaws, written notice of the time and place of special meetings of the board of directors shall be given to each director either by personal delivery or by mail, telegram, or cablegram at least two days before the meeting.

Notice of a meeting of the board of directors need not be given to any director who signs a waiver of notice either before or after the meeting. Attendance of a director at a meeting shall constitute a waiver of notice of such meeting and waiver of any and all objections to the place of the meeting, the time of the meeting, or the manner in which it has been called or convened, except when a director states, at the beginning of the meeting, any such objection or objections to the transaction of business.

Neither the business to be transacted at nor the purpose of any regular or special meeting of the board of directors need be specified in the notice or waiver of notice of such meeting unless required by the articles of incorporation or bylaws.

A majority of the directors present, whether or not a quorum exists, may adjourn any meeting of the board of directors to another time and place. Unless the articles of incorporation or bylaws otherwise provide, notice of any such adjourned meeting shall be given to the directors who were not present at the time of the adjournment and, unless the time and place of the adjourned meeting are announced at the time of the adjournment, to the other directors.

Meetings of the board of directors may be called by the chairman of the board, by the president, by 25 percent of the directors then in office, or by any other person or persons authorized by the articles of incorporation or bylaws.

History.

Code 1933, § 34C-609, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1587, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 46.

46-3-299.
Action by directors without a meeting.

Unless otherwise provided by the articles of incorporation or bylaws, any action required by this article to be taken at a meeting of the directors of an electric membership corporation or any action which may be taken at a meeting of the directors or of a committee may be taken without a meeting if written consent setting forth the action so taken is signed by all the directors or by all of the members of the committee, as the case may be, and is filed with the minutes of the proceedings of the board or the committee. Such consent shall have the same force and effect as a unanimous vote and may be stated as such in any articles or document filed with the Secretary of State under this article.

History.

Code 1933, § 34C-610, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1587, § 1.

46-3-300.
Dissent by a director.

A director of an electric membership corporation who is present at a meeting of the electric membership corporation’s board of directors at which action on any corporate matter is taken shall be presumed to have assented to the action unless:

He votes against such action if a vote is taken; and

His dissent is entered in the minutes of the meeting, or he files his written dissent to such action with the person acting as secretary of the meeting before the adjournment thereof, or he forwards such dissent by registered or certified mail or statutory overnight delivery to the secretary of the electric membership corporation within 48 hours after the adjournment of the meeting.

History.

Code 1933, § 34C-615, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1587, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 3.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 16, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the amendment to paragraph (2) is applicable with respect to notices delivered on or after July 1, 2000.

46-3-301.
Election or appointment of officers generally.

The board of directors shall elect or appoint a president, a secretary, and a treasurer. Other officers may be elected or appointed either by the board or as may be provided in the articles of incorporation or bylaws. Any two or more offices may be held by the same person, except the offices of president and secretary.

The articles of incorporation or bylaws may provide that all officers or specified officers shall be elected by the members instead of by the board.

Unless otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation, bylaws, or resolution of the board, all officers shall be elected or appointed for a term of office running until the meeting of the board following the next annual meeting of members or, in the case of officers elected by the members, until the next annual meeting of members.

Each officer shall hold office for the term for which he is elected or appointed and until his successor has been elected or appointed and has qualified, or until his earlier resignation, removal from office, or death.

All officers and agents of an electric membership corporation, as between themselves and the electric membership corporation, shall have such authority and perform such duties in the management of the electric membership corporation as may be provided in the articles of incorporation or bylaws or as may be determined by action of the board not inconsistent with the articles of incorporation and bylaws.

When the directors are deadlocked, the president shall have authority to institute or defend legal proceedings other than an action seeking appointment of a provisional director.

No electric membership corporation shall be relieved of its liability to any third person for the acts of its officers by reason of any limitations upon the power of the officer which are not known to such third person, whether such limitations are contained in the articles of incorporation, the bylaws, or elsewhere.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 644, § 11; Ga. L. 1950, p. 233, § 1; Ga. L. 1975, p. 783, § 1; Code 1933, § 34C-611, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1587, § 1.

46-3-302.
Removal of officers; filling of vacancies.

Any officer or agent elected or appointed by the board of directors may be removed by the board whenever in its judgment the best interests of the electric membership corporation will be served thereby.

An officer or agent elected by the members may be removed only by vote of the members unless the members shall have authorized the board to remove such officer or agent; but the authority of such officer or agent to act for the electric membership corporation may be suspended by the board for cause.

Any officer or agent appointed otherwise than by the board of directors or by the members may be removed with or without cause at any time by any officer having authority to appoint, except as may be otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation or bylaws, whenever such officer in his absolute discretion shall consider that the best interests of the electric membership corporation will be served thereby.

Removal as provided in this Code section shall be without prejudice to the contract rights, if any, of the person removed. Election or appointment of an officer or agent shall not of itself create contract rights.

Any vacancy, however occurring, in any office may be filled by the board of directors unless the articles of incorporation or bylaws shall have expressly reserved such power to the members.

History.

Code 1933, § 34C-612, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1587, § 1.

46-3-303.
Duty of directors and officers to act in good faith; reliance on financial information prepared by others; presumption of good faith.

A director shall perform his or her duties as a director in good faith and with the degree of care an ordinarily prudent person in a like position would exercise under similar circumstances.

In performing his or her duties a director may rely upon:

Officers, employees, or agents of the electric membership corporation whom the director reasonably believed to be reliable and competent in the functions performed; and

Information, data, opinions, reports, or statements provided by officers, employees, or agents of the electric membership corporation or by legal counsel, public accountants, investment bankers, or other persons as to matters involving the skills, expertise, or knowledge reasonably believed to be reliable and within such person’s professional or expert competence.

There shall be a presumption that the process a director followed in arriving at decisions was done in good faith and that such director exercised ordinary care; provided, however, that this presumption may be rebutted by evidence that such process constitutes gross negligence by being a gross deviation from the standard of care of a director in a like position under similar circumstances.

Nothing contained in this Code section shall:

In any instance when fairness is at issue, such as consideration of the fairness of a transaction to the electric membership corporation as evaluated under paragraph (3) of subsection (a) of Code Section 46-3-305, alter the burden of proving the fact or lack of fairness otherwise applicable;

Alter the fact or lack of liability of a director under the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, including the governance of the consequences of a conflicting interest transaction under Code Section 46-3-305;

Affect any rights to which the electric membership corporation or its members may be entitled under another law of this state or of the United States; or

Deprive a director of the applicability, effect, or protection of the business judgment rule.

History.

Code 1933, § 34C-613, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1587, § 1; Ga. L. 2020, p. 85, § 3/SB 373.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, rewrote this Code section, which read:
“Directors and officers shall discharge the duties of their respective positions in good faith and with that degree of diligence, care, and skill which ordinarily prudent men would exercise under similar circumstances in like positions. In discharging their duties, directors and officers, when acting in good faith, may rely upon financial information concerning the electric membership corporation when such information is represented to them by the president of the electric membership corporation or by the employee of the electric membership corporation having charge of its books of account, or in the form of a written report by an independent or certified public accountant or firm of such accountants, to be correct and to reflect fairly the financial condition of the electric membership corporation.”

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2020, p. 85, § 6/SB 373, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall apply only to causes of action arising on or after July 1, 2020.”

46-3-303.1.
Standard of care for officers in discharge of duties; reasonable reliances.

An officer shall perform his or her duties as an officer in good faith and with the degree of care an ordinarily prudent person in a like position would exercise under similar circumstances.

In performing his or her duties, an officer may rely upon:

Officers, employees, or agents of the electric membership corporation whom the officer reasonably believed to be reliable and competent in the functions performed; and

Information, data, opinions, reports, or statements provided by officers, employees, or agents of the electric membership corporation or by legal counsel, public accountants, investment bankers, or other persons as to matters involving the skills, expertise, or knowledge reasonably believed to be reliable and within such person’s professional or expert competence.

There shall be a presumption that the process an officer followed in arriving at decisions was done in good faith and that such officer exercised ordinary care; provided, however, that this presumption may be rebutted by evidence that such process constitutes gross negligence by being a gross deviation from the standard of care of an officer in a like position under similar circumstances.

Nothing contained in this Code section shall:

In any instance when fairness is at issue, such as consideration of the fairness of a transaction to the electric membership corporation as evaluated under paragraph (3) of subsection (a) of Code Section 46-3-305, alter the burden of proving the fact or lack of fairness otherwise applicable;

Alter the fact or lack of liability of an officer under the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, including the governance of the consequences of a conflicting interest transaction under Code Section 46-3-305;

Affect any rights to which the electric membership corporation or its members may be entitled under another law of this state or of the United States; or

Deprive an officer of the applicability, effect, or protection of the business judgment rule.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-3-303.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1988, p. 1451, § 1; Ga. L. 2020, p. 85, § 4/SB 373.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, rewrote this Code section, which read: “(a)(1) A director shall discharge his duties as director, including his duties as a member of a committee:

“(A) In good faith; and

“(B) With the care an ordinarily prudent person in a like position would exercise under similar circumstances.

“(2) In discharging his duties, a director is entitled to rely on information, opinions, reports, or statements, including financial statements and other financial data, if prepared or presented by:

“(A) One or more officers or employees of the electric membership corporation whom the director reasonably believes to be reliable and competent in the matters presented;

“(B) Legal counsel, public accountants, investment bankers, or other persons as to matters the director reasonably believes are within the person’s professional or expert competence; or

“(C) A committee of the board of directors of which he is not a member if the director reasonably believes the committee merits confidence.

“(3) A director is not acting in good faith if he has knowledge concerning the matter in question that makes unwarranted the reliance otherwise permitted by paragraph (2) of this subsection.

“(4) A director is not liable for any action taken as a director or any failure to take any action if he performed the duties of his office in compliance with this subsection.

“(b)(1) An officer with discretionary authority shall discharge his duties under that authority:

“(A) In good faith; and

“(B) With the care an ordinarily prudent person in a like position would exercise under similar circumstances.

“(C) A committee of the board of directors of which he is not a member if the director reasonably believes the committee merits confidence.

“(2) In discharging his duties, an officer is entitled to rely on information, opinions, reports, or statements, including financial statements and other financial data, if prepared or presented by:

“(A) One or more officers or employees of the electric membership corporation whom the officer reasonably believes to be reliable and competent in the matters presented; or

“(B) Legal counsel, public accountants, investment bankers, or other persons as to matters the officer reasonably believes are within the person’s professional or expert competence.

“(3) An officer is not acting in good faith if he has knowledge concerning the matter in question that makes unwarranted the reliance otherwise permitted by paragraph (2) of this subsection.

“(4) An officer is not liable for any action as an officer or any failure to take any action if he performed the duties of his office in compliance with this subsection.

“(c) The general standards of care and conduct for actions of directors or officers of electric membership corporations, which actions occur on July 1, 1988, shall be as provided in this Code section and not as provided in Code Section 46-3-303.

“(d) This Code section shall not relieve any director or officer from liability for the payment of taxes.”

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2020, p. 85, § 6/SB 373, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall apply only to causes of action arising on or after July 1, 2020.”

46-3-304.
Actions against directors and officers.

An action may be brought by any of the persons named in subsection (b) of this Code section against one or more directors or officers of an electric membership corporation to procure for the benefit of the electric membership corporation a judgment for the following relief:

To compel the defendant to account for his official conduct, or any other relief called for by his official conduct, in the following cases:

The neglect of, failure to perform, or other violation of his duties to the electric membership corporation, or violations of his duties in regard to disposition of corporate assets committed to his charge;

The acquisition by him, transfer to others, loss, or waste of corporate assets due to any neglect of, failure to perform, or other violation of his duties; or

The appropriation, in violation of his duties, of any business opportunity of the electric membership corporation;

To enjoin a proposed unlawful conveyance, assignment, or transfer of corporate assets or other unlawful corporate transaction, where there is sufficient evidence that it will be made;

To set aside an unlawful conveyance, assignment, or transfer of corporate assets, where the transferee knew of its unlawfulness and is made a party to the action.

An action may be brought for the relief provided in this Code section by the electric membership corporation, or a receiver, trustee in bankruptcy, officer, director, or judgment creditor thereof, or by a member in accordance with Code Section 46-3-272, relating to derivative actions.

No action shall be brought for the relief provided in this Code section more than four years from the time the cause of action accrued.

This Code section shall not limit any liability otherwise imposed by law upon any director or officer or any third party.

History.

Code 1933, § 34C-614, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1587, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 46.

46-3-305.
Interested directors and officers.

No contract or transaction between an electric membership corporation and one or more of its directors or officers, or between an electric membership corporation and any other corporation, partnership, association, or other organization in which one or more of its directors or officers are directors or officers or have a financial interest, shall give rise to an award of damages or other sanctions or be void or voidable solely for this reason, or solely because the director or officer is present at or participates in the meeting of the board of directors or committee thereof which authorizes the contract or transaction, or solely because any of their votes are counted for such purpose, if:

The material facts as to his or her interest and as to the contract or transaction are disclosed or are known to the board of directors or the committee, and the board or committee in good faith authorizes the contract or transaction by the affirmative votes of a majority of the disinterested directors, even though the disinterested directors are less than a quorum; or

The material facts as to his or her interest and as to the contract or transaction are disclosed or are known to the members, and the contract or transaction is specifically approved or ratified in good faith by vote of such members; or

The contract or transaction is fair as to the electric membership corporation as of the time it is authorized, approved, or ratified by the board, a committee thereof, or the members.

Interested directors may be counted in determining the presence of a quorum at a meeting of the board or committee thereof which authorizes the contract or transaction.

History.

Code 1933, § 34C-616, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1587, § 1; Ga. L. 2020, p. 85, § 5/SB 373.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in the introductory text of subsection (a), inserted “give rise to an award of damages or other sanctions or” and substituted “any of” for “his or”; and inserted “or her” near the beginning of paragraphs (a)(1) and (a)(2).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2020, p. 85, § 6/SB 373, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall apply only to causes of action arising on or after July 1, 2020.”